Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-714
School systems; tobacco, alcohol, and drugs; failure to instruct; action of State Department of Education.

School systems failing to meet the provisions of sections 79-712 and 79-713 shall be guilty of a deviation from the rules and regulations for the approval and accreditation of schools, and proper action by the State Department of Education shall be taken.

Laws 1971, LB 51, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-1270.02;

Laws 1989, LB 15, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,140.19;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 388.